North Carolina statutes. Chapter 93B. Occupational Licensing Boards.
§ 93B-1.
Definitions.

As used in this Chapter, the following definitions apply:

License. — Any license (other than a privilege license), certificate, or other evidence of qualification which an individual is required to obtain before he may engage in or represent himself to be a member of a particular profession or occupation.

Occupational licensing board. — Any board, committee, commission, or other agency in North Carolina which is established for the primary purpose of regulating the entry of persons into, and the conduct of persons within, a particular profession or occupation, and which is authorized to issue licenses. The phrase “occupational licensing board” does not include State agencies, staffed by full-time State employees, which as a part of their regular functions may issue licenses.

State agency licensing board. — Any State agency staffed by full-time State employees, which as part of their regular functions issue licenses. This section does not apply to the North Carolina Criminal Justice Education and Training Standards Commission, the North Carolina Sheriffs’ Education and Training Standards Commission, and the North Carolina Department of Revenue. The following is a nonexclusive list of State agency licensing boards and the profession or occupation for which the board, agency, or officer may issue licenses:

The Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services.

Commissioner of Agriculture.

Scale Technician. Article 6 of Chapter 81A of the General Statutes.

Seed Dealer. Article 31 of Chapter 106 of the General Statutes.

Livestock Dealer. Article 35B of Chapter 106 of the General Statutes.

North Carolina Pesticide Board.

Pesticide Applicators and Pesticide Dealers. Parts 3 and 4 of Article 52 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes.

North Carolina Board of Agriculture.

Boarding Kennel Operator and Pet Shop Owner. Article 3 of Chapter 19A of the General Statutes.

Poultry, Hatcheries, and Chick Dealers. Article 40 of Chapter 106 of the General Statutes.

Structural Pest Control Committee.

Exterminator and Structural Pest Control Applicator. Article 4C of Chapter 106 of the General Statutes.

Repealed by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 9G.7(c), effective July 1, 2021.

The Department of Health and Human Services.

North Carolina Medical Care Commission.

Ambulance Attendant, Emergency Medical Technician. Article 7 of Chapter 131E of the General Statutes.

Well Contractors Certification Commission.

Well Contractor. Article 7A of Chapter 87 of the General Statutes.

The Department of Insurance.

Commissioner of Insurance.

Bail Bond Runner, Professional Bondsman, Surety Bondsman. Article 71 of Chapter 58 of the General Statutes.

Insurance Agent, Insurance Company Adjuster, Motor Vehicle Damage Appraiser, Self-Employed Insurance Adjuster. Article 33 of Chapter 58 of the General Statutes.

Code Officials Qualifications Board.

Building Inspector, Code Enforcement Official, Electrical Inspector, Fire Inspector, Mechanical Inspector, Plumbing Inspector. Article 9C of Chapter 58 of the General Statutes.

Home Inspection Licensure Board.

Home Inspector. Article 9F of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes.

Manufactured Housing Board.

Manufactured Housing Salesperson. Article 9A of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes.

Repealed by Session Laws 2021-138, s. 17(a), effective December 1, 2021.

The Department of Labor.

Boiler Safety Bureau.

Boiler Inspector. Article 7A of Chapter 95 of the General Statutes.

The Department of Public Instruction.

State Board of Education.

Teacher, Principal, Superintendent. Article 71E of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes.

The Department of Public Safety.

Alcohol Law Enforcement Branch.

Boxer, Kickboxer, Mixed Martial Arts, Promoter. Article 8 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes.

The Alcohol Beverage Control Board.

Alcoholic Beverage Distributor. Article 9 of Chapter 18B.

Private Protective Services Board.

Counter Intelligence Licensee, Guard Dog Service Operator, Polygraph Examiner, Private Investigator, Psychological Stress Evaluator, Security Guard, and Patrol Licensee. Article 1 of Chapter 74C of the General Statutes.

The Department of the Secretary of State.

The Secretary of State.

Athletic Agent. Article 9 of Chapter 78C of the General Statutes.

Investment Advisor. Article 3 of Chapter 78C of the General Statutes.

Securities Broker, Securities Dealer, Security Salesman. Article 5 of Chapter 78A of the General Statutes.

Professional Solicitor. Article 3 of Chapter 131F of the General Statutes.

The Department of Transportation.

Division of Motor Vehicles.

New and Used Motor Vehicle Dealer, Motor Vehicle Sales Representative, Distributor, Distributor Branch, Distributor Representative, Wholesaler. Article 12 of Chapter 20 of the General Statutes.

Commercial Driver, Truck Driver. Article 2 of Chapter 20 of the General Statutes.

Safety Inspection Mechanic. Article 3A of Chapter 20 of the General Statutes.

History.

1957, c. 1377, s. 1; 2019-91, s. 2; 2020-58, s. 6.5; 2021-138, s. 17(a); 2021-180, s. 9G.7(c).

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws
2019-91, s. 6 made the amendments by Session Laws
2019-91, s. 2, effective October 1, 2019, and applicable to Certificates of Relief granted or applications for licensure submitted on or after that date.

Session Laws
2021-138, s. 22(a), is a severability clause.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2019-91, s. 2, rewrote this section. For effective date and applicability, see editor’s note.

Session Laws 2020-58, s. 6.5, effective June 30, 2020, added “and the North Carolina Department of Revenue” and made a related punctuation and stylistic change in subdivision (3).

Session Laws 2021-138, s. 17(a), effective December 1,
2021, deleted subdivision (3)e.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 9G.7(c), effective July 1, 2021, deleted subdivision (3)b.; and added subdivision (3)c.2.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “In Defense of Occupational Licensing: A Legal Practitioner’s Perspective,” see 43 Campbell L. Rev. 423 (2021).

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

Motor Vehicle Dealers’ Advisory Board

is not an occupational licensing board as defined in this section. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Lester Teal, Controller, 57 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 77 (1987).

§ 93B-2.
Annual reports required; contents; open to inspection; sanction for failure to report.

No later than October 31 of each year, each occupational licensing board shall file electronically with the Secretary of State, the Attorney General, and the Joint Legislative Administrative Procedure Oversight Committee an annual report containing all of the following information:

The address of the board, and the names of its members and officers.

(1a)

The total number of licensees supervised by the board.

The number of persons who applied to the board for examination.

The number who were refused examination.

The number who took the examination.

The number to whom initial licenses were issued.

(5a)

The number who failed the examination.

The number who applied for license by reciprocity or comity.

The number who were granted licenses by reciprocity or comity.

(7a)

The number of official complaints received involving licensed and unlicensed activities.

(7b)

The number of disciplinary actions taken against licensees, or other actions taken against nonlicensees, including injunctive relief.

The number of licenses suspended or revoked.

The number of licenses terminated for any reason other than failure to pay the required renewal fee.

(9a)

The number of applicants for a license and, of that number, the number granted a license.

(9b)

The number of applicants with a conviction record and, of that number, the number granted a license, denied a license for any reason, and denied a license because of a conviction.

(9c)

The number of applicants with military training, the number granted a license, the number denied a license for any reason, and a summary of the reasons for denial. The information provided in accordance with this subdivision shall not disclose any identifying information of any applicant.

(9d)

The number of applicants who are military spouses, the number granted a license, the number denied a license for any reason, and a summary of the reasons for denial. The information provided in accordance with this subdivision shall not disclose any identifying information of any applicant.

The substance of any anticipated request by the occupational licensing board to the General Assembly to amend statutes related to the occupational licensing board.

The substance of any anticipated change in rules adopted by the occupational licensing board or the substance of any anticipated adoption of new rules by the occupational licensing board.

No later than October 31 of each year, each occupational licensing board shall file electronically with the Secretary of State, the Attorney General, the Office of State Budget and Management, and the Joint Legislative Administrative Procedure Oversight Committee a financial report that includes the source and amount of all funds credited to the occupational licensing board and the purpose and amount of all funds disbursed by the occupational licensing board during the previous fiscal year.

(b1)

No later than October 31 of each year, each occupational licensing board or State agency licensing board shall file electronically with the Secretary of the Department of Military and Veterans Affairs information collected pursuant to G.S. 93B-2(a)(9c) and (9d).

The reports required by this section shall be open to public inspection.

The Joint Legislative Administrative Procedure Oversight Committee shall notify any board that fails to file the reports required by this section. Failure of a board to comply with the reporting requirements of this section by October 31 of each year shall result in a suspension of the board’s authority to expend any funds until such time as the board files the required reports. Suspension of a board’s authority to expend funds under this subsection shall not affect the board’s duty to issue and renew licenses or the validity of any application or license for which fees have been tendered in accordance with law. Each board shall adopt rules establishing a procedure for implementing this subsection and shall maintain an escrow account into which any fees tendered during a board’s period of suspension under this subsection shall be deposited.

No later than October 31 of each year, each State agency licensing board shall file electronically with the Secretary of State, the Attorney General, and the Joint Legislative Administrative Procedure Oversight Committee an annual report containing all of the following information:

The number of applicants for a license and, of that number, the number granted a license.

The number of applicants with a conviction record and, of that number, the number granted a license, denied a license for any reason, and denied a license because of a conviction.

The number of applicants with military training, the number granted a license, the number denied a license for any reason, and a summary of the reasons for denial. The information provided in accordance with this subdivision shall not disclose any identifying information of any applicant.

The number of applicants who are military spouses, the number granted a license, the number denied a license for any reason, and a summary of the reasons for denial. The information provided in accordance with this subdivision shall not disclose any identifying information of any applicant.

History.

1957, c. 1377, s. 2; 1969, c. 42; 2006-70, s. 1; 2007-323, s. 23.2; 2009-125, s. 2; 2011-291, ss. 2.19, 2.20; 2014-120, s. 4; 2019-91, s. 3; 2020-87, s. 2(a).

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 2014-120, s. 60, is a severability clause.

Session Laws 2019-91, s. 6 made subdivisions (a)(9a) and (a)(9b) and subsection (e) as added by Session Laws 2019-91, s. 3, effective October 1, 2019, and applicable to Certificates of Relief granted or applications for licensure submitted on or after that date.

Session Laws 2020-87, s. 2(b), provides: “By October 31, 2021, each occupational licensing board shall include the data specified in

G.S. 93B-2(a)

(9c) and (9d), as provided for in this act, for fiscal year 2019-2020 in the annual report to the Secretary of State, the Attorney General, and the Joint Legislative Administrative Procedure Oversight Committee, as required by

G.S. 93B-2(a)

. By October 31, 2021, each State agency licensing board shall include the data specified in

G.S. 93B-2(e)

(3) and (4), as provided for in this act, for fiscal year 2019-2020 in the annual report to the Secretary of State, the Attorney General, and the Joint Legislative Administrative Procedure Oversight Committee, as required by

G.S. 93B-2(e)

.”

Session Laws 2020-87, s. 4, made subsection (b1) and subdivisions (a)(9c), (a)(9d), (e)(3), and (e)(4) of this section, as added by Session Laws 2020-87, s. 2(a), effective December 1, 2020, and applicable to applications for licensure received on or after that date.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-70, s. 1, effective July 1, 2006, designated the formerly undesignated paragraphs as present subsections (a) and (c); in subsection (a), rewrote the introductory language, added subdivisions (10) and (11), and made stylistic changes throughout; and added subsection (b).

Session Laws 2007-323, s. 23.2, effective July 1, 2007, inserted “the Office of State Budget and Management” in subsection (b).

Session Laws 2009-125, s. 2, effective October 1, 2009, added “sanction for failure to report” in the section heading; in subsection (a), in the introductory language, added “No later than October 31 of each year” at the beginning, and added subdivisions (a)(7a) and (a)(7b); in subsection (b), added “No later than October 31 of each year” at the beginning, and substituted “fiscal year” for “12-month period” at the end; added subsection (d); and made minor punctuation and stylistic changes.

Session Laws 2011-291, ss. 2.19 and 2.20, effective June 24, 2011, in the introductory paragraph of subsection (a) and in subsection (b), substituted “Joint Regulatory Reform Committee” for “Joint Legislative Administrative Procedure Oversight Committee.”

Session Laws 2014-120, s. 4, effective September 18, 2014, in subsection (a), inserted “electronically” near the beginning, and, near the end, substituted “Legislative Administrative Procedure Oversight” for “Regulatory Reform”; added subdivisions (a)(1a) and (a)(5a); in subsection (b), inserted “electronically” near the beginning, and, near the middle, substituted “Legislative Administrative Procedure Oversight” for “Regulatory Reform”; and, in subsection (d), added the present first sentence.

Session Laws 2019-91, s. 3, added subdivisions (a)(9a) and (a)(9b); and added subsection (e). For effective date and applicability, see editor’s note.

Session Laws 2020-87, s. 2(a), added subsection (b1) and subdivisions (a)(9c), (a)(9d), (e)(3), and (e)(4). For effective date and applicability, see editor’s note.

§ 93B-3.
Register of persons licensed; information as to licensed status of individuals.

Each occupational licensing board shall prepare a register of all persons currently licensed by the board and shall supplement said register annually by listing the changes made in it by reason of new licenses issued, licenses revoked or suspended, death, or any other cause. The board shall, upon request of any citizen of the State, inform the requesting person as to the licensed status of any individual.

History.

1957, c. 1377, s. 3.

§ 93B-4.
Audit of Occupational Licensing Boards; payment of costs.

The State Auditor shall audit occupational licensing boards from time to time to ensure their proper operation. The books, records, and operations of each occupational licensing board shall be subject to the oversight of the State Auditor pursuant to Article 5A of Chapter 147 of the General Statutes. In accordance with G.S. 147-64.7(b), the State Auditor may contract with independent professionals to meet the requirements of this section.

Each occupational licensing board with a budget of at least fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) shall conduct an annual financial audit of its operations and provide a copy to the State Auditor.

History.

1957, c. 1377, s. 4; 1965, c. 661; 1973, c. 1301; 1983, c. 913, s. 11; 2009-125, s. 3; 2012-142, s. 17.1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-125, s. 3, effective October 1, 2009, designated the previously existing conditions as subsection (a), and added the first and last sentences in the first paragraph; and added subsection (b).

Session Laws 2012-142, s. 17.1, effective July 1, 2012, deleted the second paragraph of subsection (a) which read: “The cost of all audits shall be paid from funds of the occupational licensing board audited.”

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “In Defense of Occupational Licensing: A Legal Practitioner’s Perspective,” see 43 Campbell L. Rev. 423 (2021).

§ 93B-5.
Compensation, employment, and training of board members.

Board members shall receive as compensation for their services per diem not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00) for each day during which they are engaged in the official business of the board.

Board members shall be reimbursed for all necessary travel expenses in an amount not to exceed that authorized under

G.S. 138-6(a)

for officers and employees of State departments. Actual expenditures of board members in excess of the maximum amounts set forth in

G.S. 138-6(a)

for travel and subsistence may be reimbursed if the prior approval of the State Director of Budget is obtained and such approved expenditures are within the established and published uniform standards and criteria of the State Director of Budget authorized under

G.S. 138-7

for extraordinary charges for hotels, meals, and convention registration for State officers and employees, whenever such charges are the result of required official business of the Board.

Repealed by Session Laws 1981, c. 757, s. 2.

Except as provided herein board members shall not be paid a salary or receive any additional compensation for services rendered as members of the board.

Board members shall not be permanent, salaried employees of said board.

Repealed by Session Laws 1975, c. 765, s. 1.

Within six months of a board member’s initial appointment to the board, and at least once within every two calendar years thereafter, a board member shall receive training, either from the board’s staff, including its legal advisor, or from an outside educational institution such as the School of Government of the University of North Carolina, on the statutes governing the board and rules adopted by the board, as well as the following State laws, in order to better understand the obligations and limitations of a State agency:

Chapter 150B, The Administrative Procedure Act.

Chapter 132, The Public Records Law.

Article 33C of Chapter 143, The Open Meetings Act.

Articles 31 and 31A of Chapter 143, The State Tort Claims Act and The Defense of State Employees Law.

Chapter 138A, The State Government Ethics Act.

Chapter 120C, Lobbying.Completion of the training requirements contained in Chapter 138A and Chapter 120C of the General Statutes satisfies the requirements of subdivisions (5) and (6) of this subsection.

History.

1957, c. 1377, s. 5; 1973, c. 1303, s. 1; c. 1342, s. 1; 1975, c. 765, s. 1; 1981, c. 757, ss. 1, 2; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1011, s. 1; 2009-125, s. 4; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), 6.1.

Cross References.

For compensation and expenses of the Board of Examiners in Optometry, see G.S. 90-122. For compensation and expenses of the Board of Chiropractic Examiners, see G.S. 90-156.

Re-recodification; Technical and Conforming Changes.

Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, provides, in part: “The Revisor of Statutes shall recodify Chapter 138A of the General Statutes, Chapter 120C of the General Statutes, as well as Chapter 163 of the General Statutes, as amended by this act, into a new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes to be entitled ‘Elections and Ethics Enforcement Act,’ as enacted by Section 4 of this act. The Revisor may also recodify into the new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes other existing statutory laws relating to elections and ethics enforcement that are located elsewhere in the General Statutes as the Revisor deems appropriate.” The Revisor was further authorized to make additional technical and conforming changes to catchlines, internal citations, and other references throughout the General Statutes to effectuate this recodification. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes substituted “Subchapter II of Chapter 163A” for “Chapter 138A” in subdivision (g)(5), set out subdivision (g)(6) as repealed, and, in the closing paragraph of subsection (g), substituted “Subchapter II of Chapter 163A of the General Statutes satisfies the requirements of subdivision (5)” for “Chapter 138A and Chapter 120C of the General Statutes satisfies the requirements of subdivisions (5) and (6).”

Session Laws 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b) and 6.1 repealed Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, and authorized the Revisor of Statutes to re-recodify Chapter 163A into Chapters 163, 138A, and 120C and to revert the changes made by the Revisor pursuant to Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes reverted the changes to the reference in this section.

Editor’s Note.

As to limitations on use of State aircraft, see Editor’s note regarding Session Laws 2001-424, s. 6.12 at

G.S. 138-5

.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-125, s. 4, effective October 1, 2009, substituted “Compensation, employment, and training” for “Compensation and employment” in the section heading, and added subsection (g).

§ 93B-6.
Use of funds for lobbying prohibited.

Occupational licensing boards shall not use any funds to promote or oppose in any manner the passage by the General Assembly of any legislation.

History.

1973, c. 1302.

§ 93B-7.
Rental of state-owned office space.

Any occupational licensing board, which financially operates on the licensing fees charged and also occupies state-owned office space, shall pay rent, in a reasonable amount to be determined by the Governor, to the State for the occupancy of such space.

History.

1973, c. 1300.

§ 93B-8.
Examination procedures.

Each applicant for an examination given by any occupational licensing board shall be informed in writing or print of the required grade for passing the examination prior to the taking of such examination.

Each applicant for an examination given by any occupational licensing board shall be identified, for purposes of the examination, only by number rather than by name.

Each applicant who takes an examination given by any occupational licensing board, and does not pass such examination, shall have the privilege to review his examination in the presence of the board or a representative of the board. Except as provided in this subsection, an occupational licensing board shall not be required to disclose the contents of any examination or of any questions which have appeared thereon, or which may appear thereon in the future.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, under no circumstances shall an occupational licensing board be required to disclose to an applicant questions or answers to tests provided by recognized testing organizations pursuant to contracts which prohibit such disclosures.

History.

1973, c. 1334, s. 1; 1991, c. 360, s. 1.

§ 93B-8.1.
Use of criminal history records.

The following definitions apply in this section:

Applicant. — A person who makes application for licensure from an occupational licensing board.

Board. — An occupational licensing board or a State agency licensing board as defined in

G.S. 93B-1

.

Criminal history record. — A State or federal history of conviction of a crime, whether a misdemeanor or felony, that bears upon an applicant’s or a licensee’s fitness to be licensed or disciplined.

Licensee. — A person who has obtained a license to engage in or represent himself or herself to be a member of a particular profession or occupation.

Unless federal law governing a particular board provides otherwise, a board may deny an applicant on the basis of a conviction of a crime only if the board finds that the applicant’s criminal conviction history is directly related to the duties and responsibilities for the licensed occupation or the conviction is for a crime that is violent or sexual in nature. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a board shall not automatically deny licensure on the basis of an applicant’s criminal history, and no board may deny an applicant a license based on a determination that a conviction is for a crime of moral turpitude. The board shall make its determination based on the factors specified in subsection (b1).

(b1)

Before a board may deny an applicant a license due to a criminal conviction under subsection (b) of this section, the board must specifically consider all of the following factors:

The level and seriousness of the crime.

The date of the crime.

The age of the person at the time of the crime.

The circumstances surrounding the commission of the crime, if known.

The nexus between the criminal conduct and the prospective duties of the applicant as a licensee.

The prison, jail, probation, parole, rehabilitation, and employment records of the applicant since the date the crime was committed.

(6a)

The completion of, or active participation in, rehabilitative drug or alcohol treatment.

(6b)

A Certificate of Relief granted pursuant to

G.S. 15A-173.2

.

The subsequent commission of a crime by the applicant.

Any affidavits or other written documents, including character references.

(b2)

If the board denies an applicant a license under this section, the board shall:

(1)

Make written findings specifying the factors in subsection (b1) of this section the board deemed relevant to the applicant and explaining the reason for the denial. The board’s presiding officer must sign the findings.

(2)

Provide or serve a signed copy of the written findings to the applicant within 60 days of the denial.

(3)

Retain a signed copy of the written findings for no less than five years.

(b3)

Each board shall include in its application for licensure and on its public Web site all of the following information:

(1)

Whether the board requires applicants to consent to a criminal history record check.

(2)

The factors under subsection (b1) of this section which the board shall consider when making a determination of licensure.

(3)

The appeals process pursuant to Chapter 150B of the General Statutes if the board denies an applicant licensure in whole or in part because of a criminal conviction.

(b4)

If a board requires an applicant to submit a criminal history record, the board shall require the provider of the criminal history record to provide the applicant with access to the applicant’s criminal history record or otherwise deliver a copy of the criminal history record to the applicant. If an applicant’s criminal history includes matters that will or may prevent the board from issuing a license to the applicant, the board shall notify the applicant in writing of the specific issues in sufficient time for the applicant to provide additional documentation supporting the application for consideration by the board prior to any final decision to deny the application. After being notified of any potential issue with licensure due to criminal conviction(s), an applicant shall have 30 days to respond by either correcting any inaccuracy in the criminal history record or submitting evidence of mitigation or rehabilitation for consideration by the board.

(b5)

If, following a hearing, a board denies an application for licensure, the board’s written order shall include specific reference to any criminal conviction(s) considered as part or all of any basis for the denial and the rationale for the denial, as well as a reference to the appeal process and the applicant’s ability to reapply. No applicant shall be restricted from reapplying for licensure for more than two years from the date of the most recent application.

(b6)

Notwithstanding any other provisions in the law, an individual with a criminal history may petition a board at any time, including before an individual starts or completes any mandatory education or training requirements, for a predetermination of whether the individual’s criminal history will likely disqualify the individual from obtaining a license. This petition shall include a criminal history record report obtained by the individual from a reporting service designated by the board, the cost of which shall be borne by the applicant. Criminal history records relating to a predetermination petition shall not be considered public records under Chapter 132 of the General Statutes. A board may predetermine that the petitioner’s criminal history is likely grounds for denial of a license only after the board has applied the requirements of subsection (b) of this section. Each board shall delegate authority for such a predetermination to its Executive Director or their equivalent, or a committee of the board, so that the predeterminations can be made in a timely manner. No board member having served on a predetermination committee for an individual shall be required to recuse in any later determinations or hearings involving the same applicant. The board shall inform the individual of the board’s determination within 45 days of receiving the petition from the individual. The board may charge a fee to recoup its costs not to exceed forty-five dollars ($45.00) for each petition. If the board determines an applicant would likely be denied licensure based on their criminal history, the board shall notify the individual in writing of the following:

(1)

The grounds and reasons for the predetermination.

(2)

That the petitioner has the right to complete any requirements for licensure and apply to the board and have their application considered by the board under its application process.

(3)

That further evidence of rehabilitation will be considered upon application.

(b7)

A predetermination made under this section that a petitioner’s criminal history would likely prevent them from licensure is not a final agency decision and shall not entitle the individual to any right to judicial review under Article 4 of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes.

(b8)

A predetermination made under subsection (b6) of this section that a petitioner is eligible for a license shall be binding if the petitioner applies for licensure and fulfills all other requirements for the occupational license and the applicant’s submitted criminal history was correct and remains unchanged at the time of application for a license.

The board may deny licensure to an applicant who refuses to consent to a criminal history record check or use of fingerprints or other identifying information required by the State or National Repositories of Criminal Histories.

(c1)

Nothing in this section or in

G.S. 93B-1

shall be construed as authorizing an occupational licensing board or a State agency licensing board to require an applicant to consent to a criminal history record check or use of fingerprints or other identifying information required by the State or National Repositories of Criminal Histories as a condition of granting or renewing a license.

This section does not apply to The North Carolina Criminal Justice Education and Training Standards Commission and the North Carolina Sheriffs’ Education and Training Standards Commission.

History.

2013-24, s. 1; 2019-91, s. 4; 2020-77, s. 5(b).

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 2019-91, s. 6 made the amendments by Session Laws 2019-91, s. 4, effective October 1, 2019, and applicable to Certificates of Relief granted or applications for licensure submitted on or after that date.

Session Laws 2020-77, s. 5(c), made subsection (c1) of this section, as added by Session Laws 2020-77, s. 5(b), effective July 1, 2020, and applicable to applications for licensure or renewal received on or after that date.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2019-91, s. 4, rewrote this section. For effective date and applicability, see editor’s note.

Session Laws 2020-77, s. 5(b), added subsection (c1). For effective date and applicability, see editor’s note.

§ 93B-8.2.
Prohibit licensees from serving as investigators.

No occupational licensing board shall contract with or employ a person licensed by the board to serve as an investigator or inspector if the licensee is actively practicing in the profession or occupation and is in competition with other members of the profession or occupation over which the board has jurisdiction. Nothing in this section shall prevent a board from (i) employing licensees who are not otherwise employed in the same profession or occupation as investigators or inspectors or for other purposes or (ii) contracting with licensees of the board to serve as expert witnesses or consultants in cases where special knowledge and experience is required, provided that the board limits the duties and authority of the expert witness or consultant to serving as an information resource to the board and board personnel.

History.

2015-286, s. 1.5.

§ 93B-8.6.
Recognition of apprenticeships and training.

The following definitions shall apply in this section:

Apprenticeship. — A program that meets the federal guidelines for registered apprenticeships set out in 29 C.F.R. Part 29 and 29 U.S.C. § 50. An apprenticeship can be completed under a State-licensed practitioner of that occupation or at a State-licensed school.

Career technical education. — Programs of study, clusters, and pathways approved by the North Carolina State Board of Education or the State Board of Community Colleges.

Licensing. — Any required training, education, or fee to work in a specific profession.

Unless otherwise required by federal law, including requirements pertaining to eligibility for federal grant funding, an occupational licensing board shall grant a license to any applicant who meets the following criteria:

Completed an apprenticeship approved by the North Carolina State Approving Agency or federal Department of Labor, or otherwise permitted under State or federal law.

Passed an examination, if one is deemed to be necessary by the licensing authority.

With the exception of any prelicensing education requirements, has met any other requirements for licensure set forth in the law or rules related to the particular board.

This section shall not apply to occupational licensing boards governing professions requiring advanced knowledge acquired by a prolonged course of specialized intellectual study, including those requiring a bachelor’s or advanced degree.

Each occupational licensing board shall establish a passing score for the board’s examinations which shall not exceed the passing score that is required under the board’s standard licensing processes. If the relevant law or rule does not require an examination for the standard licensing process, no examination may be required for applicants who complete an apprenticeship in that occupation. Except as otherwise required by federal law, apprenticeships for an occupation shall not be required to exceed the number of hours required by the relevant licensing authority or statute for that occupation.

Applicants for licensure shall be permitted to apply training hours earned through career technical education provided by North Carolina public schools and colleges towards the requirements for licensure in the same occupation in accordance with the standards and procedures authorized in accordance with this Chapter.

The State Board of Community Colleges and occupational licensing boards shall adopt rules for the implementation of this section.

History.

2019-91, s. 5.

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 2019-91, s. 6 made this section effective October 1, 2019, and applicable to Certificates of Relief granted or applications for licensure submitted on or after that date.

Session Laws 2019-91, s. 5, which enacted this section, was enacted with a subsection (b1) which was redesignated as subsection (c) and other subsections redesignated accordingly at the direction of the Revisor of Statutes.

§ 93B-9.
Age requirements.

Except certifications issued by the North Carolina Criminal Justice Education and Training Standards Commission and the North Carolina Sheriffs’ Education and Training Standards Commission pursuant to Chapters 17C, 17E, 74E, and 74G of the General Statutes, no occupational licensing board may require that an individual be more than 18 years of age as a requirement for receiving a license with the following exceptions: the North Carolina Criminal Justice Education and Training Standards Commission and the North Carolina Sheriffs’ Education and Training Standards Commission may establish a higher age as a requirement for holding certification through either Commission.

History.

1973, c. 1356; 2010-97, s. 8; 2010-122, s. 27.

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 2010-97, s. 8, and 2010-122, s. 27, amended this section by adding similar language. The section is set out in the form above at the direction of the Revisor of Statutes.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2010-97, s. 8, effective July 20, 2010, deleted “Any other provision notwithstanding” from the beginning and added “with the following exceptions: the North Carolina Criminal Justice Education and Training Standards Commission and the North Carolina Sheriffs’ Education and Training Standards Commission may establish a higher age as a requirement for holding certification through either Commission.”

Session Laws 2010-122, s. 27, effective July 21, 2010, added “Except certifications issued by the North Carolina Criminal Justice Education and Training Standards Commission and the North Carolina Sheriffs’ Education and Training Standards Commission pursuant to Chapters 17C, 17E, 74E, and 74G of the General Statutes.”

§ 93B-10.
Expiration of term of appointment of board member.

A board member serving on an occupational and professional licensing board whose term of appointment has expired shall continue to serve until a successor is appointed and qualified.

History.

1973, c. 1373, s. 1.

§ 93B-11.
Interest from State Treasurer’s Investment Program.

Any interest earned by an occupational licensing board under G.S. 147-69.3(d) may be used only for the following purposes:

To reduce fees;

Improve services offered to licensees and the public; or

For educational purposes to benefit licensees or the public.

History.

1983, c. 515, s. 2.